Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5527.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 81d. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4), an individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her the person's duties with the intent to cause harm to the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her the person's duties causing with the intent to cause harm to the person and who causes a bodily injury requiring medical attention or medical care to that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her the person's duties causing with the intent to cause harm to the person and who causes a serious impairment of a body function of that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (4) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her the person's duties causing with the intent to cause harm to the person and who causes the death of that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (5) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law that is committed by that individual while violating this section. This section does not prohibit an individual from asking questions of or making inquiries to a police officer, conservation officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, or other peace officer. (6) A term of imprisonment imposed for a violation of this section may run consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for another violation arising from the same transaction. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Obstruct" includes the use or threatened use of physical interference or force or a knowing failure to comply with a lawful command. (b) "Person" means any of the following: (i) A police officer of this state or of a political subdivision of this state including, but not limited to, a motor carrier officer or capitol security officer of the department of state police. (ii) A police officer of a junior college, college, or university who is authorized by the governing board of that junior college, college, or university to enforce state law and the rules and ordinances of that junior college, college, or university. (iii) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources or the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (iv) A conservation officer of the United States department of the interior.Department of the Interior. (v) A sheriff or deputy sheriff. (vi) A constable. (vii) A peace officer of a duly authorized police agency of the United States, including, but not limited to, an agent of the secret serviceSecret Service or department of justice.Department of Justice. (viii) A firefighter. (ix) Any emergency medical service personnel described in section 20950 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20950. (x) An individual engaged in a search and rescue operation as that term is defined in section 50c. (c) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that term as defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. Sec. 167. (1) A person is a disorderly person if the person is any of the following: (a) A person of sufficient ability who refuses or neglects to support his or her the person's family. (b) A common prostitute. (c) A window peeper. (d) A person who engages in an illegal occupation or business. (e) A person who is intoxicated in a public place and who is either endangering directly the safety of another person or of property or is acting in a manner that causes a public disturbance. (f) A person who is engaged in indecent or obscene conduct in a public place. (g) A vagrant. (h) A person found begging in a public place. (i) A person found loitering in a house of ill fame or prostitution or place where prostitution or lewdness is practiced, encouraged, or allowed. (j) A person who knowingly loiters in or about a place where an illegal occupation or business is being conducted. (k) A person who loiters in or about a police station, police headquarters building, county jail, hospital, court building, or other public building or place for the purpose of soliciting employment of legal services or the services of sureties upon criminal recognizances. (l) A person who is found jostling or roughly crowding people unnecessarily in a public place. (2) If a person who has been convicted of refusing or neglecting to support his or her the person's family under this section is charged with subsequent violations within a period of 2 years, that person shall must be prosecuted as a second offender or third and subsequent offender as provided in section 168, if the family of that person is then receiving public relief or support. (3) A mother's breastfeeding of a child or expressing breast milk does not constitute indecent or obscene conduct under subsection (1) regardless of whether or not her the mother's areola or nipple is visible during or incidental to the breastfeeding or expressing of breast milk. (4) Attending a protest or mass demonstration is a fundamental right protected by the freedom of speech and freedom of association clauses of the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and sections 3 and 5 of article I of the state constitution of 1963, and by itself is not a violation of this section. The conduct of other individuals in attendance at a protest or mass demonstration must not be attributed to any other individual also in attendance unless admissible evidence demonstrates the individuals acted in concert.